District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

46-303.19

Receipt and disbursement of payments.

Repealed.

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 318, 42 DCR 6748
redesignated § 319, June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(c)(19), 53 DCR 3634

History

This section is referenced in § 46-303.07.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 30-343.18.
2001 Ed., § 46-303.18

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 16-137, designated the existing text as subsec. (a); and added subsecs. (b) and (c).

Effect of Amendments

Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”

Effective Dates

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 319 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).

Editor's Notes